Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-102 Definitions. As used in
this article, the following definitions apply:

"Approved continuing education
course" means a course approved by the commissioner following receipt of
recommendations from insurance professionals.

"Approved course provider" means an
organization or person that has been approved by the commissioner.

"Business entity" means an
association, corporation, individual, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, partnership, person, or other legal entity.

"Class" means the general categories
of insurance, as set forth in sections 431:1-204 to 431:1-210, in which
insurers may be authorized to transact the business of insurance.

"Commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner.

"Credit hour" means the value assigned
to an approved continuing education course that is equivalent to at least fifty
minutes of classroom instruction.

"Home state" means the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States in which an insurance
producer maintains the producer's principal place of residence or principal
place of business and is licensed to act as an insurance producer.

"Inactive" means that the authority
of a license issued by the commissioner is not in effect.

"Individual" means a natural person
or a business entity.

"Insurance" is defined in section
431:1-201.

"Insurance producer" or
"producer" means a person required to be licensed under the laws of
this State to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance.

"Insurer" is defined in section
431:1-202.

"License" means a document issued by
the commissioner authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer for the
lines of authority specified in the document. The license itself does not
create any authority, actual, apparent, or inherent, in the holder to represent
or commit an insurance carrier.

"Licensee" means any type of
insurance producer or producer.

"Limited line credit insurance"
includes credit life, credit disability, credit property, credit unemployment,
involuntary unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage
disability, guaranteed automobile protection ("gap") insurance, and
any other form of insurance offered in connection with an extension of credit,
that is limited to partially or wholly extinguishing that credit obligation
that the commissioner determines should be designated a form of limited line of
credit insurance.

"Limited line credit insurance
producer" means a person who sells, solicits, or negotiates one or more
forms of limited line credit insurance coverage to individuals through a
master, corporate, group, or individual policy.

"Limited lines insurance" means those
lines of insurance a producer may be licensed to sell pursuant to section
431:9A-107.5 or any other line of insurance sold to individuals under state law
or rule for which an insurance producer license in one or more of the lines of
authority set forth in section 431:9A-107(a)(1) to (4) is not required.

"Limited lines producer" means a
person authorized by the commissioner to sell, solicit, or negotiate limited
lines insurance.

"Line of authority" means a category
of insurance products, as set forth in section 431:9A-107(a), which an
insurance producer may be licensed to sell pursuant to this article.

"Line of insurance" means an
insurance product, contract, or policy designed to cover specified risks that
fall within one or more of the classes or types of insurance as defined in
sections 431:1-204 to 431:1-211, the lines of authority defined in section
431:9A-107(a), or any other section of this code.

"NAIC" means the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners.

"Negotiate" means the act of
conferring directly with or offering advice directly to a purchaser or
prospective purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of
the substantive benefits, terms, or conditions of the contract; provided that
the person engaged in the act either sells insurance or obtains insurance from
insurers for producers.

"Person" is defined in section
431:1-212.

"Sell" means to exchange a contract
of insurance by any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an
insurance company.

"Solicit" means attempting to sell
insurance or asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of
insurance from a particular company.

"Terminate" means:

(1) To cancel the relationship between an insurance
producer and an insurer;

(2) To cancel the relationship between an appointing
producer and another producer; or

(3) To terminate a producer's authority to transact
insurance.

"Uniform application" means the
current version of National Association of Insurance Commissioners' uniform
application for resident and nonresident producer licensing.

"Uniform business entity application"
means the current version of National Association of Insurance Commissioners'
uniform business entity application for resident and nonresident business
entities. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §§25, 26; am L 2003, c
55, §2; am L 2006, c 154, §23; am L 2012, c 66, §6]

Note

Definition of "credit hour" is retroactive to
January 1, 2012. L 2012, c 66, §17.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next